Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.150.295

General public school system—Maintained.

A general and uniform system of public schools embracing the common schools shall be maintained throughout the state of Washington in accordance with Article IX of the state Constitution.

[ 1969 ex.s. c 223 s 28A.02.010. Prior: 1909 c 97 p 230 s 1; RRS s 4518; prior: 1897 c 118 s 1; 1890 p 348 s 1. Formerly RCW 28A.02.010, 28.02.010.]